West Virginia, session 2026, HB4233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland security to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 6 - 1. West Virginia State Police. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-2-5 of this code, modified by the West Virginia State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the West Virginia State Police (West Virginia State Police Career Progression System, 81 CSR 03), is authorized.